test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_aigud_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - uážžuđ: # corp 
    uážžuđ+V+Inf: uážžuđ
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uážum
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pááhuh
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uážžu
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uážžoon
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: uážžuvettee
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: uážžuv
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: uážžup
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: uážžuvetteđ
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uážžuh
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uážžum
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pakkuh
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pááhui
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: páhhoim
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: páhhoid
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: páhhoin
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pááhuim
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pááhuid
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pakkuu
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Sg1: páhuččim
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Sg2: páhuččih
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Sg3: páhuččij
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Du1: páhuččáim
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Du2: páhuččáid
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Du3: páhuččáin
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Pl1: páhuččijm
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Pl2: páhuččijd
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Pl3: páhuččii

  Verb - pákkuđ: # tja 
    pákkuđ+V+Inf: pákkuđ
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pááhum
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pááhuh
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pákku
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pákkoon
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pákkuvettee
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pákkuv
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pákkup
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pákkuvetteđ
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pákkuh
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pakkum
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pakkuh
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pááhui
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: páhhoim
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: páhhoid
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: páhhoin
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pááhuim
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pááhuid
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pakkuu
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Sg1: páhuččim
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Sg2: páhuččih
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Sg3: páhuččij
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Du1: páhuččáim
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Du2: páhuččáid
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Du3: páhuččáin
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Pl1: páhuččijm
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Pl2: páhuččijd
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+Pl3: páhuččii
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Sg1: luuv
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Sg2: luuv
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Sg3: luuv
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Du1: luuv
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Du2: luuv
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Du3: luuv
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Pl1: luuv
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+Pl2: luuv
    pákkuđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: XXX
    pákkuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: XXX
    pákkuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: XXX
    pákkuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: XXX
    pákkuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: XXX
    pákkuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: XXX
    pákkuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: XXX
    pákkuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: XXX
    pákkuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: XXX
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: XXX
    pákkuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: XXX
    pákkuđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: pákkuččii
    pákkuđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: XXX
    pákkuđ+V+PrsPrc: lohhee
    pákkuđ+V+PrfPrc: luuhâm
    pákkuđ+V+Actio: luuhâm
    pákkuđ+V+Actio+Ess: luhâmin
    pákkuđ+V+Actio+Loc: luhâmist
    pákkuđ+V+Actio+Ill: XXX
    pákkuđ+V+Actio+Com: luvâdijn
    pákkuđ+V+VAbess: luvâhánnáá
